Massachusetts, session 194th, H3364.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 30 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following new section:-
Section 66. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, each agency
within the Executive branch must post all relevant Code of Massachusetts Regulations (CMR) on
the Executive agency’s website. Each agency must further update said regulations by June 30 of
each year.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective on July 1, 2027.
of 1